Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1242.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of December 7, 1982 (P.L.784, No.225), known as the Dog Law, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 306. Dog registry.(a) Establishment.--Within one year of the effective date of this subsection, the department shall establish and administer a registry containing information on dogs that are reported to the department as lost or found dogs. The database shall be known as 123456789101112131415161718192021222324 the Lost and Found Dog Registry.(b) Submission of information.--Only information on dogs reported as lost by a resident of this Commonwealth, or an individual who is not a resident if the dog was lost while in this Commonwealth, shall be added to the registry in accordance with procedures developed by the department. The reporting shall be made available through a 24-hour-response telephone number operated by the department and by accessing a direct- response email on the publicly accessible Internet website operated by the department under subsection (c). (c) Access to registry.--The department shall continuously compile information reported to the department under subsection (b) and shall provide the information on the registry to the public on a publicly accessible Internet website operated by the department. The website shall include a 24-hour telephone number and the email address monitored by the department to receive information under this subsection. The department may not charge a fee for access to the registry.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260SB1242PN1534 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516171819